North Carolina, session 2025, SB872.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of
Institutions of the Department of Adult Correction the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to construct an education center
at Harnett Correctional Institution, at which the Department of Adult Correction shall offer the
following programs for offenders:
(1) The Sexual Offender Accountability and Responsibility Program (SOAR).
(2) Four-year degree programs in partnership with Campbell University.
(3) Four-year degree programs in partnership with Fayetteville State University.
(4) One-year certifications and two-year degree programs in partnership with
Central Carolina Community College.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S872-v-1*